src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
hãkiti+v2+N:ãkiti N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc "jaguar/onça" ;
ãkitiwakury+N:ãkitiwakury N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc ;
ãkitiyãkyry+N:ãkitiyãkyry N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc ;
hãkiti-waku+N:hãkiti-waku N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc ;
amaru+N:amaru N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem-ru_te/0 "girl/menina" ;
amary+N:amary N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc-ry_te/0 "boy/menino" ;
pitxĩtxi+N:pitxi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/Ntxi "penis/pênis" ;! pitxĩ-txi
kanũtxi+N:kanu N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/Ntxi "arm/braço" ;! kanũ-txi
tsĩitxi+N+Sem/Body:tsyy N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/Ntxi "dor" ; !tsĩi-txi
tsumĩtxi+N+Sem/Body:tsumy N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/Ntxi "ânus" ; ! tsumĩ-txi
nakanhĩtxi+N:nakanhi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/Ntxi "massa de tapioca, goma" ;
yry+N:yry N_SUFFIXES_01_KinMsc_0/Y2Itxi "father/pai" ;
ynyru+N:ynyru N_SUFFIXES_01_KinFem_0/txi "mother/mãe" ;
atukyry+N:atukyry N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_KinMsc_0/Y2Itxi "grandfather/avô" ;
imatykyry+v1+N:imatykyry N_SUFFIXES_01_KinMsc_0/Y2Itxi "uncle/tio" ;
imatykyry+v2+N:iimatykyry N_SUFFIXES_01_KinMsc_0/Y2Itxi "uncle/tio:Check long-i variant" ;
tanyru+N:tanyru N_SUFFIXES_01_KinFem_0/txi "wife/esposa" ;!checkme
tanyry+N:tanyry N_SUFFIXES_01_KinMsc_0/txi "husband/esposo" ;
nyrymane+v1+N:nyrymane N_SUFFIXES_01_KinMsc_0/txi "relative/parente" ; !The non-possessed is theoretical
nyrymane+v2+N:nyrymany N_SUFFIXES_01_KinMsc_0/txi "relative/parente" ;
sytu+N:sytu N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Fem_re/0 "woman Fem_re/0?" ;! N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_0/NULL
xukary+N:xuka N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re2/ry "flatulência" ;
kanaãry+N:kanaã N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re2/ry "vômito" ;
nhipukury+N:nhipuku N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re2/ry "food/comida" ;
pirikery+N:pirike N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re2/ry "wall/parede" ;
ikiianary+N:ikiiana N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re2/ry "poison/veneno" ;
pututxi+N+Sem/Body:putu N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi-Ntxi "lip/lábio" ;
kĩpitatxi+N+Sem/Body:kĩpita N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi-Ntxi "ear/orelha" ;
kanuketxi+N+Sem/Body:kanuke N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi-Ntxi "arm/braço" ;
tapiketxi+N+Sem/Body:tapike N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi-Ntxi "leg/perna" ;
kiutatxi+N+Sem/Body:kiuta N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi-Ntxi "quadril" ;
ãkipatxi+N+Sem/Body:ãkipa N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi "coração" ;
piukytxi+N+Sem/Body:piu#ky N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi "finger/dedo da mão" ;
pyrykyretxi+N+Sem/Body:pyrykyre N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi "rim" ;
ĩipetxi+N+Sem/Body:ĩipe N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi "gordura" ;
xiripitxi+N:xiripi N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/txi "arrow/flecha" ;
ỹtanyrywatatxi+N:ỹtanyrywata N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_0/txi "marriage/casamento" ;
tukury+v1+N:tukury N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0 "roçado2" ;
kawyry+N:kawyry N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0 "pupunha" ;
maky+N:maky N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne-te/0 "castanha" ;
atsanary+N:atsanary N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0 "macaco barrigudo" ;
pathery+N:pathery N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc_te/0 "galinha" ;
aripa+N:aripa N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0 "raposa" ;
kỹpatykỹã+N:kỹpatykỹã N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_te/0 "coffee/café1" ;
atãkaari+N:atãkaari N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0 "espelho" ;
parĩa+N:parĩa N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_te/0 "farinha2" ;
ĩtima+N:ĩtima N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_ne/0 "vento" ;
puriti+N:puriti N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_ne/0 "pimenta" ;
katsywỹãru+N:katsywỹãru N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_ne/0 "cachaça3" ;
selula+N:selula N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_ne/0 "celular" ;
parithu+N:parithu N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_ne/0 "fósforo" ;
atukatxiãwitha+N:atukatxiãwitha N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc ;
kama+N:kama N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re/0 "trabalho" ;
iaxirika+N:iaxirika N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re/0 "nó" ;
sãpaka+N:sãpaka N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re/0 "cansaço" ;
ãputa+N:ãputa N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re/0 "abano" ;
ãatxapata+N:ãatxapata N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_re/0 "forquilha" ;
ãataxima+N:ãataxima N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_UND/0 ;
imi+N:imi N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc "filho";
ititi+N:ititi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_UND/0 ;
kãkyty+v1+N:kãkyty N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc ;
katsupi+N:katsupi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_UND/0 ;
kyky+N:kyky N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc_re/0 ;
mãnhi+N:mãnhi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_UND/0 ;
pũpũi+N:pũpũi N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_UND/0 ;
pupỹkary+N:pupỹkary N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc ;
ymyny+N:ymyny N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Msc ;
ytsamĩki+N:ytsamĩki N_SUFFIXES_01_Msc_UND/0 ;
ĩkamũĩ+N:ĩkamũĩ N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
kamỹyry+N:kamỹyry N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Fem_ne/0 ;
katypary+N:katypary N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
kỹpatyna+N:kỹpatyna N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
nykutxĩi+N:nykutxĩi N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
pupỹkaru+N:pupỹkaru N_SUFFIXES_01_WAKU_Fem_ne/0 ;
tsaruta+N:tsaruta N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
xitupaky+N:xitupaky N_SUFFIXES_01_Fem_ne/0 ;
